Wisconsin, session 2025, AB757.
do enact as follows:AB757,1Section 1. 36.09 (1) (e) of the statutes is amended to read:36.09 (1) (e) Subject to par. (em), sub. (3) (c), and s. 36.17 (1), the board shall appoint a president of the system; a chancellor for each institution; a dean for each college campus; the state geologist; the director of the laboratory of hygiene; the director of the psychiatric institute; the state cartographer; and the requisite number of officers, other than the vice presidents, associate vice presidents, and assistant vice presidents of the system; faculty; academic staff; and other employees and fix the salaries, subject to the limitations under par. (j) and s. 230.12 (3) (e), the duties and the term of office for each. The board shall fix the salaries, subject to the limitations under par. (j) and s. 230.12 (3) (e), and the duties for each chancellor, vice president, associate vice president, and assistant vice president of the system. No sectarian or partisan tests or any tests based upon race, religion, national origin, or sex shall ever be allowed or exercised in the appointment of the employees of the system.AB757,2Section 2. 36.09 (1) (em) of the statutes is amended to read:36.09 (1) (em) Neither the board nor any institution may adopt any policy or promulgate any rule that requires the board, the president, or a chancellor, as applicable, to consider for appointment as president of the system, chancellor, or vice chancellor to a position listed in s. 36.17 (2) or as a dean, associate dean, or assistant dean only those individuals who are faculty members of the system or another institution of higher education, who have been granted tenure within the system or another institution of higher education, or who hold the highest level of academic degree in a field of study or profession.AB757,3Section 3. 36.09 (3) (c) of the statutes is created to read:36.09 (3) (c) Neither a chancellor nor the board may exclude from consideration for appointment as a dean, associate dean, or academic department chairperson at an institution a full-time faculty member or full-time academic staff member with instructional or research responsibilities on the basis that the faculty or academic staff member has not been granted tenure, is appointed for a probationary term, or does not hold the highest level of academic degree in a field of study or profession.AB757,4Section 4. 36.09 (4) of the statutes is renumbered 36.09 (4) (b) and amended to read:36.09 (4) (b) The faculty of each institution, subject to the responsibilities and powers of the board, the president, and the chancellor of such institution, shall have the primary responsibility for advising the chancellor regarding academic and educational activities and faculty personnel matters. The(c) The faculty of each institution shall have the right to determine their own faculty organizational structure and to select representatives to participate in institutional governance, except that the as follows:1. The faculty of each institution shall ensure that faculty in academic disciplines related to science, technology, engineering, and mathematics are adequately represented in the faculty organizational structure.AB757,5Section 5. 36.09 (4) (a) and (c) 2. of the statutes are created to read:36.09 (4) (a) 1. Notwithstanding s. 36.05 (8) and subject to subd. 2., in this subsection, “faculty” means all individuals who have more than a 50 percent appointment and whose job duties consist primarily of teaching or research or who are serving as an academic department, center, or program chairperson or director.2. Faculty status under this paragraph does not confer rank or tenure or convert an academic staff appointment into a faculty appointment, but instructional academic staff are considered faculty for the purpose of this subsection.(c) 2. The faculty may not limit eligibility of faculty members to serve on or be the chairperson or director of a faculty committee, center, academic department, or program on the basis of a faculty member’s rank, tenure, appointment to a faculty title, or terminal degree attainment.AB757,6Section 6. 36.09 (4m) of the statutes is amended to read:36.09 (4m) Academic staff. The academic staff members of each institution, subject to the responsibilities and powers of the board, the president, the chancellor, and, subject to sub. (4), the faculty of the institution, shall have the primary responsibility for advising the chancellor regarding the formulation and review, and shall be represented in the development, of all policies and procedures concerning academic staff members, including academic staff personnel matters. The Subject to sub. (4), the academic staff members of each institution shall have the right to organize themselves in a manner they determine and to select their representatives to participate in institutional governance.AB757,7Section 7. 36.17 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:36.17 (1) An appointment to a position listed in sub. (2) shall be a limited appointment and the appointment shall, except as provided in s. 36.09 (2) (a) and (3) (b), be made by the board and shall be at the pleasure of the board. Notwithstanding s. 36.09 (1) (f), the board may not delegate its authority to make limited appointments. A faculty member who has been granted tenure or a person holding an academic staff appointment under s. 36.15 shall not lose that appointment by accepting a limited appointment.AB757,8Section 8. 36.17 (2) of the statutes is amended to read:36.17 (2) Limited appointments apply to the following positions: president, provost, vice president, senior vice president, associate vice president, assistant vice president, chancellor, vice chancellor, associate chancellor, assistant chancellor, associate vice chancellor, assistant vice chancellor, college campus dean, secretary of the board, associate secretary of the board, assistant secretary of the board, trust officer and assistant trust officer and such other administrative positions as the board determines at the time of the appointment.AB757,9Section 9. 36.17 (3) and (4) of the statutes are created to read:36.17 (3) The board shall approve a title, salary, and position description for each limited appointment.(4) The board shall include in the annual report under s. 36.11 (54) (b) the title, salary, and position description for each limited appointment and the number of limited appointments at each institution.AB757,10Section 10. Initial applicability.(1) The treatment of ss. 36.09 (1) (em) and (3) (c) and 36.17 (1) and (2) first applies to appointments made on the effective date of this subsection. Down Down /2025/related/vetoedinfull/ab757 true vetoedenrolledbills /2025/related/vetoedinfull/ab757 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/AB757 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/AB757 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Vetoed in Full»AB757: Text as Enrolled × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting